Maryland, session 2026, SB0082.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Criminal Law
8–601.
(a) A person, with intent to defraud another, may not counterfeit, cause to be
counterfeited, or willingly aid or assist in counterfeiting any:
(1) bond;
(2) check;
(3) deed;
(4) draft;
(5) endorsement or assignment of a bond, draft, check, or promissory note;
(6) entry in an account book or ledger;
(7) LEASE OF REAL PROPERTY;
(8) letter of credit;
– 1 –

Ch. 550 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
[(8)] (9) negotiable instrument;
[(9)] (10) power of attorney;
[(10)] (11) promissory note;
[(11)] (12) release or discharge for money or property;
(13) RENTAL AGREEMENT RELATING TO REAL PROPERTY;
[(12)] (14) title to a motor vehicle;
[(13)] (15) waiver or release of mechanics’ lien; or
[(14)] (16) will or codicil.
(b) A person may not knowingly, willfully, and with fraudulent intent possess a
counterfeit of any of the items listed in subsection (a) of this section.
(c) (1) A person who violates subsection (a) of this section is guilty of a felony
and on conviction is subject to imprisonment not exceeding 10 years or a fine not exceeding
$1,000 or both.
(2) A person who violates subsection (b) of this section is guilty of a
misdemeanor and on conviction is subject to imprisonment not exceeding 3 years or a fine
not exceeding $1,000 or both.
(d) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the prosecution of an alleged
violation of this section or for an alleged violation of a crime based on an act that establishes
a violation of this section may be commenced in any county in which:
(1) an element of the crime occurred;
(2) the deed or other alleged counterfeit instrument is recorded in the
county land records, filed with the clerk of the circuit court, or filed with the register of
wills;
(3) the victim resides; or
(4) if the victim is not an individual, the victim conducts business.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.
– 2 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 550
Approved by the Governor, May 12, 2026.
– 3 –